dev/monodix/result.id.dix
    <pardef n="ketertinggalan-ketertinggalan__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ter"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ketertinggalan-ketertinggalannya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ter"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ketertinggalan__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ter"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ketertinggalannya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ter"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pegadaian-pegadaian__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe-an"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pegadaian-pegadaiannya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe-an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pegadaian__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe-an"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pegadaiannya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe-an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pejabat-pejabat__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pejabat-pejabatnya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pejabat__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pejabatnya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="penarikan-penarikan__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="penarikan-penarikannya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="penarikan__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="penarikannya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="penulis-penulis__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="penulis-penulisnya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="penulis__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="penulisnya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="permainan-permainan__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per-an"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="permainan-permainannya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per-an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="permainan__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per-an"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="permainannya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per-an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="perenang-perenang__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="perenang-perenangnya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="perenang__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="perenangnya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bacaan-bacaan__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="san"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bacaan-bacaannya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="san"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bacaan__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="san"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bacaannya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="san"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tertidur__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ter"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="gagas"><p><l>gagasan-gagasan</l><r>gagas</r></p><par n="bacaan-bacaan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kenang"><p><l>kenang-kenangan</l><r>kenang</r></p><par n="bacaan-bacaan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tuju"><p><l>tujuan-tujuan</l><r>tuju</r></p><par n="bacaan-bacaan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tulis"><p><l>tulisan-tulisannya</l><r>tulis</r></p><par n="bacaan-bacaannya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="himpun"><p><l>himpunan</l><r>himpun</r></p><par n="bacaan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pelihara"><p><l>peliharaan</l><r>pelihara</r></p><par n="bacaan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="terus"><p><l>terusan</l><r>terus</r></p><par n="bacaan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gilir"><p><l>gilirannya</l><r>gilir</r></p><par n="bacaannya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kunjung"><p><l>kunjungannya</l><r>kunjung</r></p><par n="bacaannya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sumbang"><p><l>sumbangannya</l><r>sumbang</r></p><par n="bacaannya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="buka"><p><l>keterbukaan</l><r>buka</r></p><par n="ketertinggalan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gantung"><p><l>ketergantungan</l><r>gantung</r></p><par n="ketertinggalan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="libat"><p><l>keterlibatan</l><r>libat</r></p><par n="ketertinggalan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tarik"><p><l>ketertarikan</l><r>tarik</r></p><par n="ketertinggalan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="libat"><p><l>keterlibatannya</l><r>libat</r></p><par n="ketertinggalannya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tarik"><p><l>ketertarikannya</l><r>tarik</r></p><par n="ketertinggalannya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lapor"><p><l>pelaporan</l><r>lapor</r></p><par n="pegadaian__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lari"><p><l>pelarian</l><r>lari</r></p><par n="pegadaian__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="luncur"><p><l>peluncuran</l><r>luncur</r></p><par n="pegadaian__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mekar"><p><l>pemekaran</l><r>mekar</r></p><par n="pegadaian__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lantik"><p><l>pelantikannya</l><r>lantik</r></p><par n="pegadaiannya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lari"><p><l>pelariannya</l><r>lari</r></p><par n="pegadaiannya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="layan"><p><l>pelayanannya</l><r>layan</r></p><par n="pegadaiannya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="luncur"><p><l>peluncurannya</l><r>luncur</r></p><par n="pegadaiannya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="jabat"><p><l>pejabat-pejabat</l><r>jabat</r></p><par n="pejabat-pejabat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="main"><p><l>pemain-pemain</l><r>main</r></p><par n="pejabat-pejabat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lampung"><p><l>pelampung</l><r>lampung</r></p><par n="pejabat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lari"><p><l>pelari</l><r>lari</r></p><par n="pejabat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lumas"><p><l>pelumas</l><r>lumas</r></p><par n="pejabat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="siar"><p><l>pesiar</l><r>siar</r></p><par n="pejabat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="langgan"><p><l>pelanggannya</l><r>langgan</r></p><par n="pejabatnya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="layan"><p><l>pelayannya</l><r>layan</r></p><par n="pejabatnya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="main"><p><l>pemainnya</l><r>main</r></p><par n="pejabatnya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="menang"><p><l>pemenangnya</l><r>menang</r></p><par n="pejabatnya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="temu"><p><l>penemuan-penemuan</l><r>temu</r></p><par n="penarikan-penarikan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="buka"><p><l>pembukaan</l><r>buka</r></p><par n="penarikan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="jelma"><p><l>penjelmaan</l><r>jelma</r></p><par n="penarikan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="saji"><p><l>penyajian</l><r>saji</r></p><par n="penarikan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tangkap"><p><l>penangkapan</l><r>tangkap</r></p><par n="penarikan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="didik"><p><l>pendidikannya</l><r>didik</r></p><par n="penarikannya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lihat"><p><l>penglihatannya</l><r>lihat</r></p><par n="penarikannya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="terbit"><p><l>penerbitannya</l><r>terbit</r></p><par n="penarikannya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pimpin"><p><l>pemimpin-pemimpin</l><r>pimpin</r></p><par n="penulis-penulis__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tulis"><p><l>penulis-penulis</l><r>tulis</r></p><par n="penulis-penulis__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="duduk"><p><l>penduduk</l><r>duduk</r></p><par n="penulis__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pangku"><p><l>pemangku</l><r>pangku</r></p><par n="penulis__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="temu"><p><l>penemu</l><r>temu</r></p><par n="penulis__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dengar"><p><l>pendengarnya</l><r>dengar</r></p><par n="penulisnya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ikut"><p><l>pengikutnya</l><r>ikut</r></p><par n="penulisnya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="terus"><p><l>penerusnya</l><r>terus</r></p><par n="penulisnya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="angkat"><p><l>perangkat-perangkat</l><r>angkat</r></p><par n="perenang-perenang__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ramban"><p><l>peramban</l><r>ramban</r></p><par n="perenang__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rawat"><p><l>perawat</l><r>rawat</r></p><par n="perenang__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tapa"><p><l>pertapa</l><r>tapa</r></p><par n="perenang__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="buat"><p><l>perbuatan-perbuatan</l><r>buat</r></p><par n="permainan-permainan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tempur"><p><l>pertempuran-pertempuran</l><r>tempur</r></p><par n="permainan-permainan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ubah"><p><l>perubahan-perubahan</l><r>ubah</r></p><par n="permainan-permainan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ingat"><p><l>peringatan</l><r>ingat</r></p><par n="permainan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rebut"><p><l>perebutan</l><r>rebut</r></p><par n="permainan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tukar"><p><l>pertukaran</l><r>tukar</r></p><par n="permainan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="juang"><p><l>perjuangannya</l><r>juang</r></p><par n="permainannya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kembang"><p><l>perkembangannya</l><r>kembang</r></p><par n="permainannya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sembunyi"><p><l>persembunyiannya</l><r>sembunyi</r></p><par n="permainannya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gelincir"><p><l>tergelincir</l><r>gelincir</r></p><par n="tertidur__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="muat"><p><l>termuat</l><r>muat</r></p><par n="tertidur__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tabrak"><p><l>tertabrak</l><r>tabrak</r></p><par n="tertidur__vblex"/></e>
